Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.055

Election of freeholders in cities of three hundred thousand or more population—Designation of positions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever the population of a city is three hundred thousand persons or more, not less than ten days before the time for filing declarations of candidacy for election of freeholders under Article XI, section 10 (Amendment 40), of the state Constitution, the city clerk shall designate the positions to be filled by consecutive number, commencing with one. The positions to be designated shall be dealt with as separate offices for all election purposes, and each candidate shall file for one, but only one, of the positions so designated.

In the printing of ballots, the positions of the names of candidates for each numbered position shall be in accordance with RCW 29A.36.121.

[ 2015 c 53 s 35; 1974 ex.s. c 1 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 1: "If any provision of this 1974 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 1 s 3.]